Hawaii statutes.
[§89E-6] Payments; lapse of unexpended
funds. After payments of all costs associated with the severance benefits and
special retirement benefits, the public employer's remaining payroll balances
shall not be expended for any purpose and shall be lapsed into the appropriate
fund. [L Sp 2016 2d, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next